Illinois, session 104th, HB2316.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Parentage Act of 2015 is amended 5by changing Section 101 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 46/101)7    Sec. 101. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Parentage Act of 2015.9(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.)